Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
PART 2 CONTROL ACT
32-1-208. Statement of purposes - districts without service plans.

On or before July 1, 1986, any special district which does not have a service plan approved pursuant to this part 2 shall file a statement of purposes in the form set forth in subsection (2) of this section with the board of county commissioners of each county and governing body of each municipality which has territory included within the boundaries of the special district and with the division. The statement of purposes shall be accepted by such board of county commissioners and by such governing body of each municipality without any requirement for hearing thereon. The following documents shall be deemed to be the statement of purposes required by this section for any special district which does not have a service plan approved pursuant to this part 2 because it was at the time of organization confined exclusively within the boundaries of a municipality, and no new statement of purposes need be filed by the special district except as required by subsection (3) of this section:

The petition for organization;

The resolution or ordinance of the governing body of the municipality approving the special district;

Any agreements between the municipality and the district; and

Any plans filed with the municipality describing the services to be provided by the special district.

The statement of purposes required under this section shall describe the purposes for which the special district was organized, the services and facilities provided or to be provided by the special district, and the areas served or to be served by the special district.

Any statement of purposes filed by a special district pursuant to this section shall be subject to the requirements of and may be modified in the manner provided in section 32-1-207. The board shall notify the board of county commissioners or the governing body of any municipality in which the special district is wholly or partially located of any proposed increase in the indebtedness of the district.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to health service districts.

Source:

L. 85:

Entire section added, p. 1103, § 10, effective May 3.

L. 91:

(3) amended, p. 786, § 8, effective June 4.

L. 96:

(4) amended, p. 474, § 12, effective July 1.

32-1-209. Submission of information.

If a special district fails either to file a special district annual report pursuant to section 32-1-207 (3)(c) or to provide any information required to be submitted pursuant to section 32-1-104 (2) within nine months of the date of the request for such information, the board of county commissioners of any county or the governing body of any municipality in which the special district is located, after notice to the affected special district, may notify any county treasurer holding moneys of the special district and authorize the county treasurer to prohibit release of any such moneys until the special district complies with such requirements.

Source:

L. 91:

Entire section added, p. 786, § 9, effective June 4.